Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.10.470

Remediable violation. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

"Remediable violation" means any violation of this title that:

(1) Involved expenditures or contributions totaling no more than the contribution limits set out under RCW 29B.40.020(2) per election, or $1,000 if there is no statutory limit;

(2) Occurred:

(a) More than 30 days before an election, where the commission entered into an agreement to resolve the matter; or

(b) At any time where the violation did not constitute a material violation because it was inadvertent and minor or otherwise has been cured and, after consideration of all the circumstances, further proceedings would not serve the purposes of this title;

(3) Does not materially harm the public interest, beyond the harm to the policy of this title inherent in any violation; and

(4) Involved:

(a) A person who:

(i) Took corrective action within five business days after the commission first notified the person of noncompliance, or where the commission did not provide notice and filed a required report within 21 days after the report was due to be filed; and

(ii) Substantially met the filing deadline for all other required reports within the immediately preceding 12-month period; or

(b) A candidate who:

(i) Lost the election in question; and

(ii) Did not receive contributions over 100 times the contribution limit in aggregate per election during the campaign in question.

[ 2024 c 164 s 247.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.